Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-606
Owner of certain rental property; duties; tenant; duties; prohibited acts.

(1) The owner of a single-family dwelling or a dwelling unit in a multifamily dwelling that is used for rental purposes shall ensure that an operational carbon monoxide alarm is installed on each habitable floor of the dwelling or dwelling unit or in a location specified in any building code adopted by the state or by the political subdivision in which the dwelling or dwelling unit is located if the dwelling or dwelling unit has a fuel-fired heater or appliance, a fireplace, or an attached garage and if the owner, on or after January 1, 2017, makes any of the following where a permit is required: Any interior alteration, repair, fuel-fired appliance replacement, or addition.

(2) The owner of an existing single-family dwelling or existing dwelling unit in a multifamily dwelling that is used for rental purposes and that has a change in tenant occupancy on or after January 1, 2017, shall ensure that an operational carbon monoxide alarm is installed on each habitable floor of the dwelling or dwelling unit or in a location specified in any building code adopted by the state or by the political subdivision in which the dwelling or dwelling unit is located.

(3)(a) The owner of any rental property specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall:

(i) Prior to the commencement of a new tenant occupancy, replace any carbon monoxide alarm that was stolen, removed, found missing, or found not operational after the previous occupancy;

(ii) Ensure that any batteries necessary to make the carbon monoxide alarm operational are provided to the tenant at the time the tenant takes residence in the dwelling unit;

(iii) Replace any carbon monoxide alarm if notified by a tenant as specified in subdivision (4)(b) of this section that any carbon monoxide alarm was stolen, removed, found missing, or found not operational during the tenant's occupancy; and

(iv) Fix any deficiency in a carbon monoxide alarm if notified by a tenant as specified in subdivision (4)(c) of this section.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a) of this subsection, the owner of a single-family dwelling or dwelling unit in a multifamily dwelling that is used for rental purposes is not responsible for the maintenance, repair, or replacement of a carbon monoxide alarm or the care and replacement of batteries for the carbon monoxide alarm.

(4) The tenant of any rental property specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall:

(a) Keep, test, and maintain all carbon monoxide alarms in good repair;

(b) Notify the owner of the single-family dwelling or dwelling unit of a multifamily dwelling, or the owner's authorized agent, if any carbon monoxide alarm is stolen, removed, found missing, or found not operational during the tenant's occupancy of the single-family dwelling or dwelling unit in the multifamily dwelling; and

(c) Notify the owner of the single-family dwelling or dwelling unit of a multifamily dwelling, or the owner's authorized agent, of any deficiency in any carbon monoxide alarm that the tenant cannot correct.

(5) No person shall remove batteries from, or in any way render inoperable, a carbon monoxide alarm except as part of a process to inspect, maintain, repair, or replace the alarm or replace the batteries in the alarm.

Laws 2015, LB34, § 6.